District of Columbia statutes.
32-1451

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

Employee means an individual employed by an employer.

(2)

“Employer” means an individual, firm, association, or corporation who uses the services of another individual for pay in the District; provided, that the term employer does not include the District or the federal government.

(3)

Wages shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-1301(3).

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-219, § 2, 62 DCR 9